Maine, session 132, LD948.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2423-A, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 662, §10 and
c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
B. Cultivate up to 30 60 mature cannabis plants, up to 60 120 immature cannabis plants
and unlimited seedlings or cultivate up to 500 1,000 square feet of mature plant canopy,
up to 1,000 2,000 square feet of immature plant canopy and unlimited seedlings. A
caregiver may not cultivate immature plants by canopy if cultivating mature plants by
plant count and may not cultivate immature plants by plant count if cultivating mature
plants by canopy;
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2425-A, sub-§4, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. For an applicant holding a valid registration certificate and without any violations
of the provisions of this Act in the previous year, within 5 business days of receiving
evidence of municipal authorization pursuant to section 2429-D, subsection 3 when
necessary and payment of the registration fee pursuant to subsection 10, the department
shall issue a registry identification card to the applicant.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §2425-A, sub-§5, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. A,
§12, is further amended to read:
A. A registry identification card expires 2 years after the date of issuance, regardless
of the person's employment status, except that a caregiver's registry identification card
expires one year after the date of issuance. The card must contain:
(1) The name of the cardholder;
(2) The date of issuance and expiration date;
(3) A randomly generated unique identification number to the cardholder;
(4) A clear designation showing whether the cardholder is allowed under this
chapter to cultivate cannabis plants; and
(5) A photograph of the cardholder, if required by the department.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §2425-A, sub-§7, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. For an applicant without any violations of the provisions of this Act in the previous
year, within 10 business days of receiving evidence of municipal authorization
pursuant to section 2429-D, subsection 3 when necessary and payment of the
registration fee pursuant to subsection 10, the department shall issue a registration
certificate to the applicant.
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §2425-A, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2019, c. 331, §20 and PL
2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
8. Requirements for issuance of registration certificates. A registration certificate
expires one year 2 years after the date of issuance. The certificate must contain:
A. The name of the certificate holder;
B. The date of issuance and expiration date of the registration certificate;
C. A random identification number that is unique to the certificate holder;
Page 1 - 132LR2174(01)

D. The physical address of the certificate holder and, if the certificate holder is a
dispensary, the physical address of one additional location, if any, where cannabis
plants will be cultivated; and
E. A clear designation showing whether the certificate holder is allowed under this
chapter to cultivate cannabis plants.
Sec. 6. 28-B MRSA §208, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §40, is further
amended to read:
§208. License term
An active license issued by the office pursuant to section 205, subsection 4 is effective
for a period of one year 2 years from the date of issuance and may be renewed pursuant to
section 209.
Sec. 7. 28-B MRSA §209, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Automatic renewal; licensees with no violations. For licensees without any
violations of the provisions of this Act in the previous year and that have obtained local
authorization as required by section 402, subsection 3, paragraph B or, in the case of a
cannabis establishment located in the unorganized and deorganized areas, as required by
section 403, subsection 3, paragraphs B and C, 90 days prior to the expiration of an existing
license issued under section 205, subsection 4, the office shall require only the payment of
the license fee under this section and shall issue a new active license prior to the expiration
of the current active license.